dev/verbs.chopped.dix
    <pardef n="izvēl/ēties__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēties</l>
          <r>ēties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēšos</l>
          <r>ēties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēsimies</l>
          <r>ēties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēties</l>
          <r>ēties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēties</l>
          <r>ēties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēsies</l>
          <r>ēties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēties</l>
          <r>ēties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēsieties</l>
          <r>ēties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēsities</l>
          <r>ēties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēsies</l>
          <r>ēties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēties</l>
          <r>ēties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēties</l>
          <r>ēties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ējos</l>
          <r>ēties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēties</l>
          <r>ēties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ējāmies</l>
          <r>ēties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēties</l>
          <r>ēties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ējies</l>
          <r>ēties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēties</l>
          <r>ēties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēties</l>
          <r>ēties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ējāties</l>
          <r>ēties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēties</l>
          <r>ēties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ējās</l>
          <r>ēties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ējos</l>
          <r>ēties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>ēties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēties</l>
          <r>ēties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēties</l>
          <r>ēties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ējamies</l>
          <r>ēties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amies</l>
          <r>ēties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ējies</l>
          <r>ēties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ies</l>
          <r>ēties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēties</l>
          <r>ēties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ējaties</l>
          <r>ēties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aties</l>
          <r>ēties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēties</l>
          <r>ēties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ējas</l>
          <r>ēties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>ēties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēties</l>
          <r>ēties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="izvēlēties"><i>izvēl</i><par n="izvēl/ēties__vblex"/></e>
